Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1703
Time-share estate; status with respect to real property interests.

(1) A time-share estate is an estate in real property and has the character and incidents of an estate in fee simple at common law or estate for years, if a leasehold, except as expressly modified by the Nebraska Time-Share Act.

(2) A document transferring or encumbering a time-share estate in real property shall not be rejected for recordation because of the nature or duration of the estate or interest.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 68, § 3.